Hawaii, session 2025, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There shall be established within the office of the state fire marshal in the department of labor and industrial relations an electric vehicle fires working group to examine the impact of electric vehicle fires in residential, commercial, and business properties that have confined parking structures, including any potential rise in insurance costs associated with having electric vehicles and their charging stations located in confined parking structures. (b)  The electric vehicle fires working group shall consist of: (1)  The state fire marshal, who shall serve as chairperson of the working group; (2)  The insurance commissioner, or the commissioner's designee; (3)  The comptroller, or the comptroller's designee; (4)  The chairperson of the public utilities commission, or the chairperson's designee; (5)  A member of the facility maintenance agency from each county; and (6)  A member of the building permitting agency from each county. (c)  The state fire marshal shall invite the following individuals to become members of the electric vehicle fires working group: (1)  A representative for commercial parking structures; and (2)  A representative from the condominium industry. (d)  The electric vehicle fires working group shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027 of its findings and recommendations, including recommendations on: (1)  Updating the state fire code, building code, and electrical code to make parking structures more resilient to electric vehicle fires and for purposes of fire containment; (2)  Additional training for the county fire departments; and (3)  Proposed legislation. (e)  The electric vehicle fires working group shall cease to exist on June 30, 2027. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________